resources/hyphenation/en-US.tex
.ach4
.ad4der
.af1t
.al3t
.am5at
.an5c
.ang4
.ani5m
.ant4
.an3te
.anti5s
.ar5s
.ar4tie
.ar4ty
.as3c
.as1p
.as1s
.aster5
.atom5
.au1d
.av4i
.awn4
.ba4g
.ba5na
.bas4e
.ber4
.be5ra
.be3sm
.be5sto
.bri2
.but4ti
.cam4pe
.can5c
.capa5
.car5ol
.ca4t
.ce4la
.ch4
.chill5i
.ci2
.cit5r
.co3e
.co4r
.cor5ner
.de4moi
.de3o
.de3ra
.de3ri
.des4c
.dict5i
.do4t
.du4c
.dumb5
.earth5
.eas3i
.eb4
.ef5t
.e4lf
.e4lm
.en3s
.ep5oi
.er4ri
.es3
.eu3
.ev2
.e2ve
.ever5
.ex5ulc
.eyen4
.fes3
.fly5
.fo4c
.fes3
.fo4c
.for5mer
.fres5c
.fru2
.fu3el
.ful4
.ga2
.gg4
.gi5a
.gi4b
.go4r
.hand5i
.han5k
.hap5t
.har5m
.he2
.hero5i
.hes3t
.het3
.hi3b
.hi3er
.high5
.hon5ey
.hon5or
.hov5
.id4l
.idol5
.im3m
.im5pin
.in1
.in3ci
.ine2
.in2k
.in3s
.ir5r
.is4i
.ju3r
.la4cy
.la4m
.lat5er
.lath5
.le2
.leg5e
.len4
.lep5
.lev1
.li4g
.lig5a
.li2n
.li3o
.li4t
.mag5a5
.mal5o
.man5a
.mar5ti
.me2
.mer3c
.me5ter
.mis1
.mist5i
.mon3s
.mor5ph
.mam5
.mul2t5i
.my5s
.nad1
.nag5
.nar5c
.nas3c
.nat5ur
.nau3se
.ne2
.nee4
.ness5
.neu3r
.ni4ce
.ni4t
.nit3r
.no5bl
.nom3
.non5it
.non3o
.non3s
.noo4
.nor5m
.nu1c
.obser5v
.oc3t
.of5t
.on4ce
.op3
.or3c
.or1d
.or3t
.os3
.oth5er
.out5
.over5
.pal5m
.pap5
.para1
.pe4ce
.per5t
.pes1
.phi5a
.pho5n
.pi4ci
.pi3f
.pi2n5
.pi4t
.pla5ce
.plan5et
.plat5i
.pli3a
.ploy5
.pol5i5cy
.po5lit
.por5t
.pot5
.pram5
.pro3f
.pro3v
.psych5
.pu4t
.ra4c
.ran4t
.ra5rie
.ras2
.ra4v
.re5al
.re2fer3
.re1i
.re5it
.re1o1
.rep5resent
.res2
.re1u
.rev2
.ri4g
.ri3o
.ro4q
.ros5t
.row5d
.ru3a
.run5
.sa2
.sal5t
.san4
.se2
.sel4
.semi5
.ser3v
.sh2
.si2
.sig4
.sin4d
.sis5t
.snu4
.sol4
.spec3
.spher5
.spin5
.spi2
.spr4
.sp4
.sta4l
.stand5
.ste4
.stif5
.sti3v
.sub3
.sue4
.sum3
.su2per1
.sys1
.ta4
.tab4
.tan4
.tel4
.ten5an
.tig4
.til4
.tim5o5thy
.ti2n
.to4n
.top5
.tou5s
.trag5
.tra4b
.trans3
.tre5f
.tri3a
.tri3ce
.tum5ul
.tur3bl
.tuto5r
.twin4
.ty5p
.u1ni3
.un2i
.un3s
.un1wis
.up3
.ur4r
.us5a5b
.u1se
.ush4
.u1su
.utu4
.va2
.val5or
.var5i3a
.ve4r5s
.vi2
.vi3a
.vi3o
.vio5l
.vi3s
.vol5um
.vul1
.wil5i
.wind5i
.wis4
.yte4
a5ba
ab5i5na
abl2
a2bn
ab3o5li
abs2
ab5ul
a4cab
a5cal
ac5am
ac1c
a2ce
acen4
ac4er
a4ces
ac1q
ac4qu
ac2r
ac3ry
ac4ta
ac4te
ac3ul
ac4um
a2d
ad4din
ad5er
a3di5a
adi4er
a3dip
a3dis
adi3u
ad4le
ad3ow
ad3re
ad2s
a3du
a3dv
af4fa
af5fy
af1t
a5fy
agg4
ag5ing
a5gio
ag3n
ago5ni
a5guer
ag5ul
a4gy
a3ha
a3he
ah4ly
a4i2b
aid4ed
a3ies
aim5a
a3io
air3s
ait5en
a1ja
ak1en
al5ab
al3ad
ala5m
al5bo
al3c
al2ch
al3cy
al2d
al3da
aldi5
al3e
ale3a
al3ea
al3ga
al5i3a
al5ib
ali3en
al3ig
al1is
al5ism
al5ist
al5it
al3iv
al5l2a
al1ma
al5od
al3of
al3og
al5om
al3on
al5ow
al2ph
al3t
al3th
alu4m
alum5i
al5umn
al3v
al3w
al2ya
am5ab
am3ag
ama5ra
am5asc
am5at
am5b2
ame5r
am3ic
ami3en
am5ine
am3ing
am5ish
am5it
am3ix
am5o5ra
am3ove
amp4
an1c
an4ces
an3ci
anci4en
an4c4l
an4cy
and4
an3d4r
an1e
aned1
an3em
an5est
a3neu
ang4l
an1gl
an4g4r
an1ic
an3icy
ani3m
an5ism
an3ist
an3ite
an3iti
an3ity
an3ix
an1o
an3os
an3ov
an3s2
ans5w
an3th
an5ti3
an3tic
anti3s
an3u
an3y
a5ome
a5op
aor5
ap3ag
a5pers
a3ph
a4phe
aph5ely
a4phon
ap3lic
ap4no
ap2p
ap5pea
ap3pr
ap2t
aq2
ar2c
arch4
ar3cha
ar2d
ar4dr
a3re
ar3ea
ar4ent
a3res
ar4fi
ar4fl
ar1i
ar5iat
ar3ie
ar5if
ar1ig
ar3il
ar1is
ar2ist
ar3it2
ar2iz
ar4l2e
ar1m
ar4m4s
ar4na
ar3nal
ar4ni
ar3nis
ar3od
ar5oi
ar3ol
ar2on
ar3os
ar4ot
ar2ph
ar2q
ar1r
ar4sa
ar2sh
ar3shal
ar3t
ar5ta
ar4tif
ar4tig
ar5tis
ar3tiz
ar4tl
ar4tor
ar4tr
ar5um
ar5un
ar3v
as3a
a5sce
as3ci
asco5
a2se
as4ent
a4ses
as5hes
ash4ly
a5sid
as3ig
as3il
a2sis
as3it
asm5
as4me
a5so
as3oc
as5oid
a5sol
as5om
as3op
a3sor
as3ov
as3pa
as3ph
as4por
a5ssa
as2s3i
as3sid
as4sim
as3t2
as4ta
a5stay
a5stem
as1tr
a4stra
asy5
a3teg
aten5
ater5
a5tes
ath3
a5tha
at4hen
ath5er
a3tic
at3ig
at3il
at5im
at3in
at3io
at3is
at3ism
at3iv
at3ix
at5iz
atl4
at4me
at4mo
at5om
at5on
at3op
ato5ph
at3or
at3ory
at3ot
at3ov
at1r
at3ra
ater5
at3ul
at5um
at3ur
at3us
a5typ
au1d
au5du
au5el
au5er
au5l2
aun5d
au3r
au1s
au3se
aus3t
au1th
a3uv
av4ar
a5va
av3e
aved4
a3vi
av4id
avig4
a5vis
av3it
av3ob
av3oc
av3oi
av3on
av4or
av3ot
a5vou
aw3ar
aw1i
aw1o
a5wr
ax5is
ax4l
ax4or
ax5ot
a3y
ay5al
aye4
ay3er
ay5ism
ayu4
b2
ba4g
ba5gle
bal1a
ban5d
ban4t
bar5m
bar3r
base3
ba5si
bas4s
bast4
ba4z
b4b
b2d
be1c
be1d
be1f
bel5v
be1m
be5nig
be1r
be5s
be1t
b4f
b4h
bi5b
bi4d
bi3f
bi5g
bin4d
bi3o
b4it
bk4
b2l2
bl4an
blas4t
bl2d
b4le
bl4e3a
bled5
blen4
bl4in
blis4
blit5
bliz3
blo4w
blun4
bly5
b4n
boas4
bo4e
bol4d
bom4b5
bon4d
boo4
bos4
bour5
b4ov
bo4w
boy5i
b4r
bras4
brav5
brev5
bri4
br4ig
brim5
bris4
bro4w
b4s
bu4d
bun4d
bun5k
bus3h
but2
b4w
ca4bl
cal4la
cam5ou
can5cel
cans4
can4t
cap5it
car5ol
car3r
ca4s
cas3t
cav3il
c4b
cc4
c2ch4
c3d
cel4la
cen4t
c4es
ch2
ch4ar
ch3em
ch5ism
cit5r
ck1
cl2
cl5ag
c4lan
clar5i
cle4m
cle5o
cli4
clin4
clo3
cly5
cm4
co2g
col5umn
com3at
com1b
con4ce
con3t
cop3
cord5
cor3n
cov3
cr2
cri4
crip3t
cris4
cro4
cu4d
cul4ti
cum3
cup5el
cur3r
cu5ti
cy4c
cyp4
d2
daf4
dan3c
dar5t
daugh4
dav4
daw4
de4b
de4f
def5in
de3la
de3mo
dep4th
de4r
de3ri
des3c
des4o
de3su
de5v
dev3il
di2
dic4t
dif4
dig4
di3gr
di1s
dis1c
dis3t
di5v
dl4
dn4
do4c
doch4
doc5u
dol4f
don4
doo4
dor4
dorm5i
dot4
dou3b
dov5
dr2
dra4g
dres5
dri4
drom4
drop4
dros4
dru4
d4s2
dum4b
du4n
dut5
dv4
dys3
each4
ear3n
e3ar5t
eas3i
east3
eau3
ec4la
eco5li
e5col
econ3
ec3ul
e3da
e2d1u
ef4
ef1f
ef3r
eg4
e3h
eigh4
e3igr
e3l3i
e3l5ow
em3b
em5er
em3ig
em5it
em5m
em3p
ems2
em5u
en3am
en5d
ener3
en3g
en3ic
en5ish
en3it
en5n
en3o
en3s2
en3te
en3ti
en3tr
en4v
ep5h
ep5ic
ep4sh
ep5ul
eq2
er3a
er4ar
er4c
er4d
e3re
er3en
er5er
er4f
er4g
er4h
er3i
er4im
er3in
eri4o
er3is
er4it
er1l
er3m
er4n
er4o
er3os
er3p
er4q
er4r
er3s
er4t
er3th
er3ti
er1u
er4v
er3w
er4y
e3s2c
e2s5i
es4p
e2ss
es5t
e4ster
es3tr
etch5
e4te
eth3
e3tic
et3ig
et4ig
et3in
et3io
et3it
et3r
e5tr
et3ul
et3um
e3un
eup3
eur4
e5us
ev3er
eved4
even4
ever4
ev3id
e3voc
e5vou
e5vov
ev3ul
e4w
ex3a
ex3i
ex3it
ex3o
ex5ul
ex3ur
ex3us
e3za
f2
fac3t
fan5c
far3r
far4t
fe3lic
fer3
fic3
fic4ti
fin4d
fi3nis
fis4c
fis3t
fl2
fla4g
flar4
flas4
fle4
flie4
flo4w
f4o
fol5d
fon4d
fora4
for5m
for3n
for4s
fr2
fra4g
frag5m
fran4
fra4s
fre4
freck5l
frig4
fron4t
frus5
f4s
fu4
fug5
ful4f
ful3l
ful4ly
fun4d
fun4g
fur4n
g2
ga4t
gal3la
gem4
gen4s
ger4m
ges4t
gig5
gl2
gli4
glo4w
gm4
gn4
go4r
gra4f
grat5u
gr2i
gris4t
gro4t
grou4
gru4d
gs2
gu4t
gul4f
gun4d
gur4
gus4t
gut4t
h2
ha4l
ham4m
han4d
han4g
hap3
har3m
has4t
ha4t
hav5
he2d
he2r
hered5
her5o
his4t
hm4
ho4c
hon4
hor4
hos4t
ho4t
hov5
hs4
hu4m
hum3b
hun4d
hyp3
hy3ph
i1a
ia5b
ia5l
ia3n
ia3r
ia3t
ib3er
ib5it
ib3ul
ic3al
ic5ial
ic5i3a
ici5en
ic3ie
ic3if
ick5
ic5ob
ic3ol
ic3on
ic3or
ic3os
ic3ot
id3i
id5i5o
id4ism
id5ist
id3it
i1e
if4f
ig3l
ig5n
ig4ni
ig3no
ig3nu
ii4
il3a
il5am
il3as
ild5r
il3em
il3f
il4g
il3i
il3ig
il5ism
il3ist
il3it
il3iv
il3iz
il3l
il5la
il4l3a
il4le
il4li
il3ly
il5os
il3p
il3r
il3s
il3t
il3v
im1b
im3ig
im5in
im5m
im3p
im5ph
im3ul
in3al
in3ci
in3d
ined4
in3em
in4er
in3et
in3g
in3i
in3is
in3it
in4o
in4og
in3ol
in3on
in3op
in3or
in3ot
in3ou
in3s
in3st
in3t
in1u
in3ut
in3v
io4
io3g
io3n
io3r
io3s
io3t
ip3
ip3at
ip5er
ip3h
ip3i
ip3ic
ip4l
ip3n
ip5o
ip3p
ip3s
ir3a
ir3c
ir3e
ir4em
ir5et
ir3g
ir3i
ir4is
ir3it
ir3l
ir3m
ir3n
ir3o
ir3p
ir3r
ir3s
ir3t
ir3u
ir3v
is4ab
is3al
is3am
is3c
isch4
is3em
is3er
is3et
is3h
is4i
is3m
is3n
is4o
is3ol
is3on
is3or
is3os
is3ot
is3p
is4pat
is3s
is3t
ite3
it3er
it3ig
it3in
it3io
it3is
it3iv
it3iz
it1l
it3r
it3ul
it3um
it3ur
it3us
i3ty
iv3el
iv3en
iv3er
iv3es
iv5ism
iv5ist
iv3it
iv3iv
iv3or
i3vy
ja4
jab5
jag4
jas4
jo4
k2
kal4
kan4t
kar4
kat4
kil4
kina4
kl4
kn4
kni4
ko4
kr4
l2
la4c
la5dy
lan4d
lar3r
lar4s
las4
lav4
lay5er
le2f
lec5t
leg5
le2m
le2n
le5na
lend5
le3o
le4p
le4s
lest5
le4t
lev4
li2d
lie4
lim4b
lim3it
lin4d
lin4g
lis4t
lit3
ll4
lo4c
lom4b
lon4g
loo4
lor4d
los4
lot4
lou4d
lo5v
lp4
lr4
lt4
lum3b
lum4f
lun4d
lus4t
m2
mac3r
mal4t
man3
man5d
mar4c
mar3t
mas4t
ma4t
mav4
me2d
me3di
meg4
mel4
men4d
men4t
mer3i
mes3
met3r
mig4
min3i
mir4
mis4t
ml4
mm4
mn4
mo4g
mol5d
mon3
mon4t
moo4
mor4
mor5ph
mos4t
mo4t
mou4r
ms4
mul3t
mun4d
mus4t
na4t
nal5
nat3u
nav4
nec5t
neg3
n3el
n3em
n3er
nes4
net3
neu4
new4
nf4
ng4
ni4c
ni4g
nin4e
nin4th
nk4
nn4
no4c
noc5t
nol5
nor4m
nos4
not3
no4v
ns4
nu4m
num3b
nys4
oa4
ob3l
ob5long
o3b4r
oc3t
of3t
ol4d
ol5f
olo4g
ol5ov
om3b
om5bu
on3d
on4g
on5l
ons4
or3c
or3d
or4dr
or3m
or3n
or3p
or4s
or3t
or4v
os3c
os3m
os3p
oss5i
ot3al
ot5ic
ot3im
ot3in
ot3io
ot3is
ot3iv
ot3ix
ot3r
ot3ul
ot3ur
ow4d
ow5el
ow5er
ow5n
ow3s
ox5id
p2
pal3
pan4d
pan4t
par5af
par3c
par4s
par3t
pas4t
pa4t
pav4
pen4d
per3m
per3n
per3t
pet3
phi4
pho5r
pi4c
pi3f
pig4
pin4d
pi4t
plac4
plag4
plan4
plas4
plat4
ple4
plic4
pli4
plo4
plum4
plun4
poc4
pog4
pol4
pol5d
pon4d
pop4
pos4t
pot4
pou5r
pow4
pr2
prac4
pre3s
pro3f
pro3v
pro3x
pug4
pu4l
pum4p
pun4d
pur4
put4
qu2
qua4d
quar4
que4
r2
ra4c
rag4
ran4d
ran4t
rap4t
rar4e
ras4t
rat4h
ra4t
rav4
re2d
re3l
rem4
ren4d
ren4t
rep4
res5t
ret3r
rev4
ri4c
rig4
rin4d
rin4g
ris4t
rit3
rk4
rl4
rm4
rn4
ro4c
rod4
ron4d
rop4
ros4t
rot4
rou4d
rp4
rs4
rt4
ru4d
run4d
rup4
rus4t
rw4
s2
san4d
san4g
sav4
sc2
sci4
sc4r
se4c
sec3t
sel4l
sen4d
sen4t
ser4v
set4t
sh2
sha4d
sha4g
sha4l
sha4n
sh4ar
shar4p
shat4
she4
shel4
sher4
shin4
shi4p
sho4
sho4r
shot4
shr4
shu4d
si4c
sig4
si4l
sim4
sin4d
sin4g
sis4
sit4
sk2
skin4
sl2
sli4
sm2
sn4
sol4d
son4d
son4t
sor4
sow4
sp2
spar4
spat4
spe4
spin4
spit4
spr4
sput4
st2
sta4
stan4d
star4t
stat4
stem4
ster4
stic4
stil4
sti4r
ston4
stop4
str4
stri4
stu4d
su4b5
sug4
sun4d
sup5
sur4
sus4
sw4
sy4
t2
tal4k
tan4d
tar4t
tas4t
ta4t
tav4
te4c
tec4t
ten4d
ten4t
ter4m
ter4n
ter4r
ter4s
tes4t
te4t
th2
tha4
thaw4
the4
ther4
thi4
tho4
thr4
ti4c
tig4
ti4l
tim4b
tin4d
tin4g
tis4
tit4
tm4
ton4d
ton4g
top4
tor4
tos4t
tot4
tou4r
tow4
tr2
tra4c
trag4
tran4
tra4s
tre4
trig4
trin4
tri4s
trit4
tron4
trop4
trot4
trou4
tru4d
trun4
ts4
tu4b
tum4b
tun4d
tun4g
tur4n
ty4p
u4b
ud5er
ul4l
ul3t
um4b
um3p
un3a
un4d
un4g
un3i
un3is
un1l
un3o
un3s
un3t
up3
ur4g
ur4n
ur4r
ur4s
us4t
ut4t
uu4
v2
va4c
va4g
val4d
van4t
var4
ve4c
ven4d
ven4t
ver3m
ver3n
ver4s
ver3t
ves4t
ve4t
vi4c
vig4
vi4l
vin4d
vin4g
vis4t
vit4
w2
wan4d
wan4g
war4m
was4t
wa4t
wee4
wh2
wha4
whe4
whi4
who4
whr4
win4d
win4g
wis4
wit4
wl4
wn4
won4d
woo4
wr4
writ4
x2
xis5t
y2
ya4
yar4
yas4
yer4
ying4
yp4
yr4
z2
zan4
zar4
ze4
zer4
zing4
zo4
zon4
